California, session 20252026, AB1472.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30972 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30972. (a) (1) There is hereby created within the Ocean Protection Council the California Sea Level Rise State and Regional Support Collaborative.(2) In its role as the collaborative, the Ocean Protection Council shall coordinate with the other state planning and coastal management agencies, including, but not limited to, the Office of Planning and Research, to the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, the Strategic Growth Council, the State Lands Commission, the California Coastal Commission, the State Coastal Conservancy, and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, to administer the grants and on the kind of information and support it provides local, regional, and other state agencies consistent with their statutory authority.(b) The collaborative shall provide state and regional information to the public and support to local, regional, and other state agencies for the identification, assessment, planning, and, where feasible, the mitigation of the adverse environmental, social, and economic effects of sea level rise within the coastal zone and the area under the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, pursuant to Section 66610 of the Government Code. The support the collaborative provides to local and regional agencies shall include, but not be limited to, technical assistance on updating local and regional land use plans to take into account sea level rise.